Hawaii statutes.
§804-7 Release after bail. When bail
is offered and taken the prisoner shall be discharged from custody or
imprisonment. [PC 1869, c 50, §4; RL 1925, §3982; RL 1935, §5436; RL 1945,
§10737; RL 1955, §256-7; HRS §709-7; ren L 1972, c 9, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next